Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 16

Launderers', Cleaners' and Storage Liens

66-16-101 — 66-16-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§66-16-101 —66-16-106 (Acts 1937, ch. 95, §§ 1-5; c. Supp. 1950, §§ 7988.1-7988.5 (Williams, §§ 8088.1-8088.5); Acts 1978, § 561, § 34; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-1601 — 64-1606), concerning definitions, records and addresses of customers, possessory liens, enforcement of lien, notice, redemption by customer, and sale of articles, were repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 778, § 3, effective April 5, 1990.

66-16-107. Enforcement against articles left for storage.

If articles received for storage by a retail launderer or retail dry cleaner are not ordered from storage within sixty (60) days from the expiration of the storage date, as fixed upon the memorandum at the time the articles were received for storage, then a notice by registered mail shall be sent to the address given at the time each article was received for storage, or to the new address of the person from whom the article was received, if such person is known to have changed such person's address, demanding that the article be taken from storage within thirty (30) days, or the storage charges paid and a new contract for storage entered into.

If at the expiration of thirty (30) days the article has not been removed from storage or a new storage contract made, then a second registered letter shall be sent, setting out a general description of the article, the charges against it, and a date not less than twelve (12) days from the date of mailing the letter when the article will be offered by public sale at the principal plant of the person who received it for storage. A copy of the letter shall be posted in a prominent place in the laundry or cleaning plant of the person mailing the letter, where the letter or notice is open to public inspection.

If the charges are not paid by the date fixed for the sale, the article shall be offered for sale and sold to the highest bidder for cash and the proceeds applied to paying the cost of storage and mailing the necessary letters, and the balance shall be retained for a period of six (6) months for the benefit of the person from whom the article was received and shall at any time during those six (6) months be paid to that person on demand. At the expiration of six (6) months from the date of sale, the sum shall be paid to the state treasurer who shall deal with it in accordance with the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in chapter 29 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 95, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 7988.6 (Williams, § 8088.6); Acts 1978, ch. 561, § 34; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1607; Acts 1990, ch. 778, § 2; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act” in the last sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

66-16-108. Sale of articles — Notice to customer.

If a garment or article left with a retail launderer or retail dry cleaner for laundering or dry cleaning is not redeemed by the customer within ninety (90) days, the launderer or dry cleaner may, without liability or responsibility for the article or garment, dispose of it at a public or private sale or in any other manner; provided, that the launderer or dry cleaner has notified the customer by registered letter mailed to the customer's last known address that the article or garment will be disposed of unless it is redeemed within thirty (30) days from the date of the letter.

If a garment or article left with a retail launderer or retail dry cleaner for laundering or dry cleaning is not redeemed by the customer within one hundred eighty (180) days, the launderer or dry cleaner may, without any liability or responsibility for the article or garment, and without notification to the customer, dispose of the article or garment in any manner suitable to the launderer or dry cleaner.

Acts 1990, ch. 778, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.